ani_numerals.lexd
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# NUMERALS
# 
# I treat 100- and 1000- formations as two words, e. g. лъоб бешенугу '300' and лъоб озуругу '3000' and 
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

PATTERNS

# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# cardinal numerals
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

Numerals[one] [<NUM>:] [>:>] agrCl[-f] ([>:>] [<pl>:ул])?
Numerals[one] [<NUM>:] [>:>] agrCl[f] ([>:>] [<pl>:ил])?
Numerals[one] [<NUM>:] [>:>] agrCl [>:>] [<obl><m>:ш] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,-vowel_morpheme,-n.m.sg]
Numerals[one] [<NUM>:] [>:>] agrCl [>:>] [<obl><m>:шу] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,vowel_morpheme]
Numerals[one] [<NUM>:] [>:>] agrCl [>:>] Inflection[-m,-vowel_morpheme]
Numerals[one] [<NUM>:] [>:>] agrCl [>:>] [<obl><nm>:лъи] [>:>] Inflection[-m,vowel_morpheme]

CardinalNumerals
CardinalNumerals [>:>] [<obl><m>:ш] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,-vowel_morpheme,-n.m.sg]
CardinalNumerals [>:>] [<obl><m>:шу] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,vowel_morpheme]
CardinalNumerals [>:>] [<obl><nm>:л] [>:>] Inflection[-m,-vowel_morpheme]
CardinalNumerals [>:>] [<obl><nm>:ллъи] [>:>] Inflection[-m,vowel_morpheme]

# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# collective numerals
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

CollectiveNumerals
CollectiveNumerals [>:>] [<obl><m>:ш] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,-vowel_morpheme,-n.m.sg]
CollectiveNumerals [>:>] [<obl><m>:шу] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,vowel_morpheme]
CollectiveNumerals [>:>] [<obl><nm>:л] [>:>] Inflection[-m,-vowel_morpheme]
CollectiveNumerals [>:>] [<obl><nm>:ллъи] [>:>] Inflection[-m,vowel_morpheme]

# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ordinal numerals
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

OrdinalNumerals ([>:>] [<pl>:ул])?
OrdinalNumerals [>:>] [<obl><m>:ш] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,-vowel_morpheme,-n.m.sg]
OrdinalNumerals [>:>] [<obl><m>:шу] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,vowel_morpheme]
OrdinalNumerals [>:>] Inflection[-m,-vowel_morpheme]
OrdinalNumerals [>:>] [<obl><nm>:лъи] [>:>] Inflection[-m,vowel_morpheme]

# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# distributive numerals
# During the tens reduplication two rightmost syllable can be reduplicated. Therefore I decided to list all forms.
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

DistributiveNumerals
DistributiveNumerals [>:>] [<obl><m>:ш] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,-vowel_morpheme,-n.m.sg]
DistributiveNumerals [>:>] [<obl><m>:шу] [>:>] Inflection[-nm,vowel_morpheme]
DistributiveNumerals [>:>] [<obl><nm>:л] [>:>] Inflection[-m,-vowel_morpheme]
DistributiveNumerals [>:>] [<obl><nm>:ллъи] [>:>] Inflection[-m,vowel_morpheme]

# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# adverbial ordinal
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

Numerals[-one,-four] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<ord><adv>:цIулду]
agrCl [>:>] Numerals[four] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<ord><adv>:цIулду]
Numerals[-one,-four,-ten,-hundred,-thousand] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<crown>:цIол] [>:>] [<ord><adv>:цIулду]
agrCl [>:>] Numerals[four] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<crown>:цIол] [>:>] [<ord><adv>:цIулду]

# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# iterative numerals
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

Numerals[one] [<NUM>:] [>:>] agrCl [>:>] [<itn>:цIу] [>:>] [<num>:гу]
Numerals[-one,-four] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<itn>:цIу] [>:>] [<num>:гу]
agrCl [>:>] Numerals[four] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<itn>:цIу] [>:>] [<num>:гу]
Numerals[-one,-four,-ten,-hundred,-thousand] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<crown>:цIол] [>:>] [<itn>:цIу] [>:>] [<num>:гу]
agrCl [>:>] Numerals[four] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<crown>:цIол] [>:>] [<itn>:цIу] [>:>] [<num>:гу]


PATTERN CardinalNumerals

Numerals[-one,-four] [<NUM>:] ([>:>] [<num>:гу])?
agrCl [>:>] Numerals[four] [<NUM>:] ([>:>] [<num>:гу])?
Numerals[ten] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<teen_link>:лъий]
Numerals[-one,-four,-ten,-hundred,-thousand] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<crown>:цIол] [>:>] ([<num>:гу] | [<linker>:лой])
agrCl [>:>] Numerals[four] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<crown>:цIол] [>:>] ([<num>:гу] | [<linker>:лой])


PATTERN CollectiveNumerals

Numerals[one] [<NUM>:] ([>:>] [<pl>:л])? [>:>] agrCl [>:>] [<add>:ло]
Numerals[-one,-four,-three] [<NUM>:] ([>:>] [<pl>:л])? [>:>] [<num>:гу] [>:>] [<add>:ло]
Numerals[three] [<NUM>:] ([>:>] [<pl>:ул])? [>:>] [<num>:гу] [>:>] [<add>:ло]
agrCl [>:>] Numerals[four] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<num>:гу] [<add>:ло]
Numerals[-one,-four,-ten,-hundred,-thousand] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<crown>:цIол] [>:>] [<num>:гу] [>:>] [<add>:ло]
agrCl [>:>] Numerals[four] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<crown>:цIол] [>:>] [<num>:гу] [>:>] [<add>:ло]


PATTERN OrdinalNumerals

Numerals[-one,-four,-three] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<ord>:лдеб]
Numerals[three] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<ord>:деб]
agrCl [>:>] Numerals[four] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<ord>:лдеб]
Numerals[-one,-four,-ten,-hundred,-thousand] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<crown>:цIол] [>:>] [<ord>:деб]
agrCl [>:>] Numerals[four] [<NUM>:] [>:>] [<crown>:цIол] [>:>] [<ord>:деб]


LEXICON DistributiveNumerals

<rdp>>чIегу<NUM>><num>:чIе>чIе>гу
<rdp>>лъобгу<NUM>><num>:лъоб>лъоб>гу
<rdp>>боъогу<NUM><m>><num>:воъо>воъо>гу
<rdp>>боъогу<NUM><f>><num>:йоъо>йоъо>гу
<rdp>>боъогу<NUM><an><sg>><num>:боъо>боъо>гу
<rdp>>боъогу<NUM><an><pl>><num>:йоъо>йоъо>гу
<rdp>>боъогу<NUM><inan1>><num>:боъо>боъо>гу
<rdp>>боъогу<NUM><inan2>><num>:роъо>роъо>гу
<rdp>>иᵸшдугу<NUM>><num>:иᵸшду>иᵸшду>гу
<rdp>>ойлIигу<NUM>><num>:ойлIи>ойлIи>гу
<rdp>>гьокьугу<NUM>><num>:гьокьу>гьокьу>гу
<rdp>>бейкьигу<NUM>><num>:бейкьи>бейкьи>гу
<rdp>>гьочIогу<NUM>><num>:гьочIо>гьочIо>гу
<rdp>>гьоцIогу<NUM>><num>:гьоцIо>гьоцIо>гу
<rdp>>бешенугу<NUM>><num>:беше>бешену>гу
<rdp>>озуругу<NUM>><num>:озу>озуру>гу
<rdp>>озуругу<NUM>><num>:ози>озиру>гу
<rdp>>чIегу<NUM>><crown>><num>:чIецIол>чIе>цIол>гу
<rdp>>лъобгу<NUM>><crown>><num>:лъобцIол>лъоб>цIол>гу
<rdp>>боъогу<NUM><m>><crown>><num>:воъо>воъо>цIол>гу
<rdp>>боъогу<NUM><f>><crown>><num>:йоъо>йоъо>цIол>гу
<rdp>>боъогу<NUM><an><sg>><crown>><num>:боъо>боъо>цIол>гу
<rdp>>боъогу<NUM><an><pl>><crown>><num>:йоъо>йоъо>цIол>гу
<rdp>>боъогу<NUM><inan1>><crown>><num>:боъо>боъо>цIол>гу
<rdp>>боъогу<NUM><inan2>><crown>><num>:роъо>роъо>цIол>гу
<rdp>>иᵸшдугу<NUM>><crown>><num>:иᵸшду>иᵸшду>цIол>гу
<rdp>>ойлIигу<NUM>><crown>><num>:ойлIи>ойлIи>цIол>гу
<rdp>>гьокьугу<NUM>><crown>><num>:гьокьу>гьокьу>цIол>гу
<rdp>>бейкьигу<NUM>><crown>><num>:бейкьи>бейкьи>цIол>гу
<rdp>>гьочIогу<NUM>><crown>><num>:гьочIо>гьочIо>цIол>гу


LEXICON Numerals

себ:се[one]                                                 # один; one
чIегу:чIе                                                   # два; two
лъобгу:лъоб[three]                                          # три; three
боъогу:оъо[four]                                            # четыре; four
иᵸшдугу:иᵸшду                                               # пять; five
ойлIигу:ойлIи                                               # шесть; six
гьокьугу:гьокьу                                             # семь; seven
бейкьигу:бейкьи                                             # восемь; eight
гьочIогу:гьочIо                                             # девять; nine
гьоцIогу:гьоцIо[ten]                                        # десять; ten
бешенугу:бешену[hundred]                                    # сто; hundred
озуругу:озуру[thousand]                                     # тысяча; thousand
озуругу:озиру[thousand]                                     # тысяча; thousand


LEXICON agrCl

<m>:в
<f>:й[f]
<an><sg>:б
<an><pl>:й
<inan1>:б
<inan2>:р


LEXICON Inflection

<gen>:лIи[nm]
<gen><pl>:лI>ол[nm]
<dat>:лъу[n.m.sg]
<erg>:ди
<dat>:й[vowel_morpheme]
<gen><m>:в[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><f>:й[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><an><sg>:б[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><an><pl>:й[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><inan1>:б[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><inan2>:р[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><m>><pl>:в>ул[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><f>><pl>:й>ил[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><an><pl>><pl>:й>ил[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><inan1>><pl>:б>ул[m,vowel_morpheme]
<gen><inan2>><pl>:р>ул[m,vowel_morpheme]
<aff><m>:во[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><f>:йо[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><an><sg>:бо[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><an><pl>:йо[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><inan1>:бо[vowel_morpheme]
<aff><inan2>:ро[vowel_morpheme]
<sub><ess>:кьи
<sub><lat>:кьи
<sub>><el>:кьи>кку
<super><ess>:ъа
<super><lat>:ъо
<super>><el>:ъа>кку
<in><ess>:ла
<in><lat>:ди
<in>><el>:ла>кку
<inter><ess>:лIи
<inter><lat>:лIи
<inter>><el>:лIи>кку
<ad><ess>:ха
<ad><lat>:хо
<ad>><el>:хо>кку
<apud><ess>:хъи
<apud><lat>:хъи
<apud>><el>:хъи>кку
<cont><ess>:чIу
<cont><lat>:чIу
<cont>><el>:чIу>кку
